Nevada, session 83, SB316.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 679B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. On or before June 1 of each year, a health insurer shall
compile and submit to the Commissioner a report which contains
the following information:
(a) Lists of:
(1) The 25 prescription drugs most frequently prescribed to
insureds in this State during the immediately preceding calendar
year;
(2) The 25 prescription drugs which accounted for the
largest percentage of spending on prescription drugs in this State
by the health insurer in the immediately preceding year; and
(3) The 25 prescription drugs with the largest increase in
the percentage of spending on prescription drugs in this State by
the health insurer in the immediately preceding year, as compared
to the previous year; and
(b) For each prescription drug included on a list compiled
pursuant to paragraph (a) for the immediately preceding year:
(1) The aggregate wholesale acquisition costs for the drug,
calculated by adding together for all units of the drug dispensed to
insureds in this State the wholesale acquisition cost of the drug at
the time each unit was dispensed;
(2) The aggregate amount of rebates received by a
pharmacy benefit manager under contract with the insurer
relating to the distribution of the drug to insureds in this State;
-
*SB316_R1*

– 5 –
(3) The aggregate amount of administrative fees received
by a pharmacy benefit manager under contract with the insurer
relating to the distribution of the drug to insureds in this State;
(4) The aggregate amount paid or reimbursed by a
pharmacy benefit manager under contract with the insurer to
affiliated pharmacies in this State for the drug;
(5) The aggregate amount paid or reimbursed by a
pharmacy benefit manager under contract with an insurer to
nonaffiliated pharmacies in this State for the drug; and
(6) The aggregate amount of fees received from any source
by a pharmacy benefit manager under contract with the insurer
relating to the distribution of the drug to insureds in this State.
2. On or before July 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Commissioner shall:
(a) Compile a report on the overall impact of prescription drug
costs on premiums for health insurance in this State based on the
reports submitted to the Commissioner pursuant to subsection 1.
The data in the report compiled pursuant to this subsection must
be in aggregated form and must not reveal information specific to
a particular health insurer or manufacturer of a drug, including,
without limitation, information relating to a manufacturer’s
individual or aggregate discounted prices for a prescription drug.
(b) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Health and Human Services and the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Commerce and Labor.
(c) Present the report at a meeting of the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services.
(d) Post the report on an Internet website operated by the
Division.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, any
information submitted by a health insurer pursuant to this section
is confidential and is not a public record.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Affiliated pharmacy” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 3 of this act.
(b) “Health insurer” means any insurer or organization
authorized pursuant to this title to conduct business in this State
that provides or arranges for the provision of health care services,
including, without limitation, an insurer that issues a policy of
health insurance, an insurer that issues a policy of group health
insurance, a carrier serving small employers, a fraternal benefit
society, a hospital or medical services corporation, a health
maintenance organization, a plan for dental care, a prepaid
-
*SB316_R1*

– 6 –
limited health service organization and a managed care
organization.
(c) “Insured” means a person covered by a policy of health
insurance issued in this State by a health insurer.
(d) “Manufacturer” has the meaning ascribed to it in 42
U.S.C. § 1396r-8(k)(5).
(e) “National Drug Code” means the numerical code assigned
to a prescription drug by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
(f) “Nonaffiliated pharmacy” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 9 of this act.
(g) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 683A.174.
(h) “Rebate” has the meaning ascribed to it in section 13 of
this act.
(i) “Wholesale acquisition cost” means the manufacturer’s
published list price for a prescription drug with a unique National
Drug Code for sale to a purchaser or entity that purchases the
prescription drug from the manufacturer, not including any
rebates or other price concessions.
Sec. 2. Chapter 683A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 3 to 19, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 3. “Affiliated pharmacy” means a pharmacy that
directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries,
controls, is controlled by or is under common control with a
pharmacy benefit manager.
Sec. 4. “Claim” means a request for payment for:
1. Administering, filling or refilling a prescription; or
2. Providing a pharmacist service or a medical supply or
device to a covered person.
Sec. 5. “Control” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 692C.050.
Sec. 6. “Cost-sharing obligation” includes, without
limitation, a copayment, coinsurance or deductible imposed upon
or collected from a covered person in connection with filling a
prescription or obtaining other pharmacist services.
Sec. 7. “Manufacturer” has the meaning ascribed to it in 42
U.S.C. § 1396r-8(k)(5).
Sec. 8. “Network plan” means a pharmacy benefits plan
offered by a third party under which the financing and delivery of
pharmacist services is provided, in whole or in part, through a
defined set of providers under contract with the third party. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
-
*SB316_R1*

– 7 –
Sec. 9. “Nonaffiliated pharmacy” means a pharmacy that:
1. Directly, or indirectly through a pharmacy services
administrative organization, contracts with a pharmacy benefit
manager; and
2. Does not control, is not controlled by and is not under
common control with the pharmacy benefit manager.
Sec. 10. “Pharmacist services” means the provision of
products, goods or services, or any combination thereof, provided
as a part of the practice of pharmacy, as defined in NRS 639.0124.
Sec. 11. “Pharmacy benefit management services” includes,
without limitation:
1. Negotiating the price of prescription drugs, including,
without limitation, negotiating or contracting for direct or indirect
rebates, discounts or price concessions on prescription drugs.
2. Managing any aspect of a pharmacy benefits plan,
including, without limitation:
(a) Developing or managing a formulary;
(b) Processing and paying claims for prescription drugs;
(c) Performing reviews of the utilization of prescription drugs;
(d) Processing requests for prior authorization for
prescriptions;
(e) Adjudicating appeals and grievances relating to a
pharmacy benefits plan;
(f) Contracting with pharmacies to provide pharmacist services
for covered persons;
(g) Managing the cost of covered prescription drugs on behalf
of a third party; and
(h) Managing or providing data relating to a pharmacy
benefits plan.
3. Performing any administrative, managerial, clinical,
pricing, financial, reimbursement, data administration, reporting
or billing service for a third party in relation to a pharmacy
benefits plan.
Sec. 12. “Pharmacy services administrative organization”
means an entity that provides contracting and other administrative
services relating to prescription drug benefits to pharmacies.
Sec. 13. “Rebate” means any discount, remuneration or
other payment paid by a manufacturer or wholesaler to a
pharmacy benefit manager after a claim has been adjudicated or
completed at a pharmacy. The term does not include a bona fide
service fee, as defined in 42 C.F.R. § 447.502.
Sec. 14. “Wholesaler” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 639.016.
Sec. 15. 1. A pharmacy benefit manager that manages a
network plan shall not:
-
*SB316_R1*

– 8 –
(a) Require a covered person to use an affiliated pharmacy to
fill a prescription or obtain other pharmacist services if there is a
nonaffiliated pharmacy in the applicable network;
(b) Induce, persuade or attempt to induce or persuade a
covered person to transfer a prescription to or otherwise use an
affiliated pharmacy instead of a nonaffiliated pharmacy in the
applicable network;
(c) Unreasonably restrict a covered person from using a
particular pharmacy in the applicable network for the purpose of
filling a prescription or receiving pharmacist services covered by
the pharmacy benefits plan of the covered person;
(d) Communicate to a covered person that the covered person
is required to have a prescription filled or receive other pharmacist
services at a particular pharmacy if there are other pharmacies in
the applicable network that have the ability to dispense the
prescription or provide the pharmacist services required by the
covered person;
(e) Discriminate against a nonaffiliated pharmacy based on
the nonaffiliated status of the pharmacy, including, without
limitation, by:
(1) Offering materially different terms or conditions to a
nonaffiliated pharmacy based on the status as a nonaffiliated
pharmacy;
(2) Refusing to renew or terminating a contract with a
nonaffiliated pharmacy on the basis that the pharmacy is a
nonaffiliated pharmacy, or for reasons other than those that apply
equally to affiliated pharmacies; and
(3) Reimbursing a nonaffiliated pharmacy for a pharmacist
service in an amount that is less than the pharmacy benefit
manager would reimburse an affiliated pharmacy for the same
pharmacist service; or
(f) Deny a pharmacy the opportunity to participate in a
network or receive a preferred status if the pharmacy is willing to
accept the same terms and conditions that the pharmacy benefit
manager has established for affiliated pharmacies as a condition
for participating in the network or receiving preferred status, as
applicable.
2. As used in this section, “network” means a defined set of
pharmacies that are under contract to provide pharmacist services
pursuant to a network plan.
Sec. 16. A pharmacy benefit manager:
1. Upon the request of a third party for which the pharmacy
benefit manager manages a pharmacy benefits plan, shall disclose
to the third party, in writing, the amounts and types of charges,
fees and commissions in the aggregate that the pharmacy benefit
-
*SB316_R1*

– 9 –
manager charges the third party for providing pharmacy benefit
management services or otherwise receives in connection with
managing the pharmacy benefits plan of the third party,
including, without limitation, administrative fees and rebates
collected from pharmacies, manufacturers and wholesalers.
2. Shall make available for inspection by the Commissioner,
upon request of the Commissioner, any contract between the
pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy or a third party.
3. Shall disclose to a third party for which the pharmacy
benefit manager manages a pharmacy benefits plan, upon request
of the third party, information relating to the clinical efficacy and
clinical evidence regarding the inclusion, exclusion or limitation
of prescription drugs in a formulary maintained by the pharmacy
benefit manager.
Sec. 16.5. 1. A pharmacy benefit manager shall not derive
income from providing pharmacy benefit management services in
this State except for income derived from administrative fees paid
by the third party with which the pharmacy benefit manager has
entered into an agreement to provide pharmacy benefit
management services. Such administrative fees must be set forth
in the agreement between the pharmacy benefit manager and the
third party.
2. A pharmacy benefit manager shall provide:
(a) Any income generated through discounts offered by a
manufacturer or wholesaler and any fees or other incentives
collected from a manufacturer or wholesaler in connection with
providing pharmacy benefit management services for a third party
to the third party to which the discount, fee or other incentive
pertains; and
(b) Any income generated through rebates received from a
manufacturer or wholesaler in connection with providing
pharmacy benefit management services to covered persons.
Sec. 17. 1. A pharmacy benefit manager shall not:
(a) Unreasonably obstruct or interfere with the ability of a
covered person to timely access a prescription drug or device that
has been prescribed to the covered person at a contract pharmacy
of the person’s choice.
(b) Enter into, amend, enforce or renew a contract with a
manufacturer that expressly or implicitly provides for the
exclusive coverage of a drug, medical device or other product by a
pharmacy benefits plan or group of pharmacy benefits plans.
(c) Enter into, amend, enforce or renew a contract with a
pharmacy or pharmacy services administrative organization that
expressly or implicitly restricts the ability of a nonaffiliated
pharmacy to contract with third parties.
-
*SB316_R1*

– 10 –
(d) Make or disseminate any statement, representation or
advertisement that is, or reasonably should be known to be,
untrue, deceptive or misleading.
2. As used in this section, “contract pharmacy” means a
pharmacy that contracts directly with a pharmacy benefit
manager, or indirectly with a pharmacy benefit manager through
a pharmacy services administrative organization.
Sec. 18. 1. A pharmacy benefit manager that violates the
provisions of NRS 683A.171 to 683A.179, inclusive, and sections 3
to 19, inclusive, of this act is subject to a civil penalty of not less
than $1,000, but not more than $7,500, for each violation. This
penalty must be recovered in a civil action brought in the name of
the State of Nevada by the Attorney General.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a violation
of paragraph (l) of subsection 1 of NRS 683A.179 or section 15 of
this act constitutes a deceptive trade practice for the purposes of
NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive. This subsection does not
create a private right of action.
3. The Attorney General may:
(a) Conduct an investigation to determine whether a pharmacy
benefit manager, either directly or indirectly, has violated or is
violating the provisions of NRS 683A.171 to 683A.179, inclusive,
and sections 3 to 19, inclusive, of this act, or any regulations
adopted thereto.
(b) If he or she believes that a pharmacy benefit manager,
either directly or indirectly, is violating or is about to violate the
provisions of NRS 683A.171 to 683A.179, inclusive, and sections 3
to 19, inclusive, of this act, seek an injunction or other equitable
relief to halt or prevent such a violation.
4. The remedies and penalties set forth in this section are not
exclusive and are in addition to any other remedies and penalties
provided by law.
5. The Commissioner shall:
(a) Establish procedures for receiving, investigating, tracking
and publicly reporting complaints submitted by persons in this
State against pharmacy benefit managers.
(b) Publish on an Internet website maintained by the
Commissioner each complaint against a pharmacy benefit
manager received pursuant to paragraph (a) which is determined
by the Commissioner to be justified based on a determination by a
preponderance of the evidence that the pharmacy benefit manager
violated the provisions of NRS 683A.171 to 683A.179, inclusive,
and sections 3 to 19, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 19. 1. On or before April 1 of each year, a pharmacy
benefit manager shall submit to the Commissioner:
-
*SB316_R1*

– 11 –
(a) A report which includes the information prescribed by
subsection 2; and
(b) A statement signed under the penalty of perjury affirming
the accuracy of the information in the report.
2. The report submitted pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 must include:
(a) Lists of:
(1) The 50 prescription drugs with the highest wholesale
acquisition costs at the time the report is submitted;
(2) The 50 prescription drugs most frequently prescribed to
covered persons in this State during the immediately preceding
calendar year; and
(3) The 50 prescription drugs which produced the largest
amount of revenue for the pharmacy benefit manager in this State
during the immediately preceding calendar year.
(b) For each prescription for a drug included on a list
compiled pursuant to paragraph (a) that was issued to a covered
person in this State during the immediately preceding year:
(1) The type of pharmacy that filled the prescription. The
type of pharmacy may be an integrated pharmacy, chain
pharmacy, specialty pharmacy, mail order pharmacy or other type
of pharmacy.
(2) Information relating to pricing of and rebates for the
drug, including, without limitation:
(I) The total amount that the pharmacy benefit manager
paid to the pharmacy for filling the prescription;
(II) The net amount that the pharmacy benefit manager
paid to the pharmacy for filling the prescription, after accounting
for any fees or assessments imposed by the pharmacy benefit
manager against the pharmacy;
(III) The amount of any rebate negotiated by the
pharmacy benefit manager with the manufacturer for the
purchase of the drug;
(IV) The amount of any rebate described in sub-
subparagraph (III) that was passed on to either the applicable
third party or the covered person; and
(V) The amount that the applicable third party paid the
pharmacy benefit manager for the drug.
(c) Information prescribed by regulation of the Commissioner
that allows the Commissioner to determine whether each claim for
a prescription drug included on a list compiled pursuant to
paragraph (a) required prior authorization. Such information
must be in deidentified form.
-
*SB316_R1*

– 12 –
(d) For each prescription drug appearing on a list compiled
pursuant to paragraph (a), the aggregate amount for the
immediately preceding year of the:
(1) Cost of the drug, calculated by adding together for all
units of the drug dispensed in this State the wholesale acquisition
cost of the drug at the time each unit was dispensed;
(2) Amount of rebates negotiated for the purchase of the
drug in this State;
(3) Amount of administrative fees received from a
manufacturer or wholesaler for services provided in this State
relating to the drug;
(4) Amount paid or reimbursed to affiliated pharmacies in
this State for the drug; and
(5) Amount paid or reimbursed to nonaffiliated pharmacies
in this State for the drug.
(e) A list of the third parties with which the pharmacy benefit
manager has contracted, the scope of services provided to each
third party and the number of persons covered in this State by
each third party listed.
(f) The total amount of revenue derived from providing
pharmacy benefit management services in this State in the
immediately preceding year.
(g) The expenses incurred by providing pharmacy benefit
management services in this State in the immediately preceding
year.
(h) The identity of each group purchasing organization
employed, contracted or otherwise utilized by or affiliated with the
pharmacy benefit manager.
(i) A copy of each contract entered into with a group
purchasing organization identified pursuant to paragraph (h).
(j) The aggregate financial benefit derived in the immediately
preceding year from the use of the group purchasing
organizations identified pursuant to paragraph (h).
(k) A list of the types and amounts of fees that the pharmacy
benefit manager has collected during the immediately preceding
year for performing pharmacy benefit management services in this
State and a description of how those fees are calculated.
(l) A copy of all fee agreements entered into with third parties,
pharmacies and pharmacy services administrative organizations
doing business in this State.
(m) The amount of each premium, deductible, cost-sharing
obligation or fee charged by the pharmacy benefit manager to
covered persons in this State or other persons on behalf of such
covered persons.
-
*SB316_R1*

– 13 –
3. On or before July 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Commissioner shall:
(a) Compile a report on the overall impact of pharmacy benefit
managers on the cost of prescription drugs in this State based on
the reports submitted to the Commissioner pursuant to subsection
1. The data in the report compiled pursuant to this subsection
must be in aggregated form and must not reveal information
specifically concerning an individual purchaser or manufacturer
of a drug, including, without limitation, information relating to a
manufacturer’s individual or aggregate discounted prices for a
prescription drug.
(b) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Health and Human Services and the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Commerce and Labor.
(c) Present the report at a meeting of the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services.
(d) Post the report on an Internet website operated by the
Division.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, any
information submitted by a pharmacy benefit manager pursuant to
this section is confidential and is not a public record.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose any
recordkeeping obligation on a third party for which a pharmacy
benefit manager manages a pharmacy benefits plan.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Group purchasing organization” means a person
employed, contracted or otherwise utilized by or affiliated with a
pharmacy benefit manager to negotiate, obtain or procure rebates
from manufacturers or wholesalers.
(b) “National Drug Code” means the numerical code assigned
to a prescription drug by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
(c) “Wholesale acquisition cost” means the manufacturer’s
published list price for a prescription drug with a unique National
Drug Code for sale to a wholesaler or any other purchaser or
entity that purchases the prescription drug from the manufacturer,
not including any rebates or other price concessions.
Sec. 20. NRS 683A.171 is hereby amended to read as follows:
683A.171 As used in NRS 683A.171 to 683A.179, inclusive,
and sections 3 to 19, inclusive, of this act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 683A.172
to 683A.176, inclusive, and sections 3 to 14, inclusive, of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
-
*SB316_R1*

– 14 –
Sec. 21. NRS 683A.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
683A.175 “Pharmacy benefits plan” means coverage of
prescription drugs and pharmacist services provided by a third
party.
Sec. 21.5. NRS 683A.176 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
683A.176 “Third party” means:
1. An insurer, as that term is defined in NRS 679B.540;
2. A health benefit plan, as that term is defined in NRS
687B.470, for employees which provides a pharmacy benefits plan;
3. A [participating public agency, as that term is defined in
NRS 287.04052, and any other] local governmental agency of the
State of Nevada which provides a system of health insurance for the
benefit of its officers and employees, and the dependents of officers
and employees, pursuant to chapter 287 of NRS; or
4. The public option established pursuant to NRS 695K.200; or
5. Any other insurer or organization that provides health
coverage or benefits or coverage of prescription drugs as part of
workers’ compensation insurance in accordance with state or federal
law.
 The term does not include the Public Employees’ Benefits
Program or an insurer that provides coverage under a policy of
casualty or property insurance.
Sec. 22. NRS 683A.177 is hereby amended to read as follows:
683A.177 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the requirements of NRS 683A.171 to 683A.179, inclusive, and
sections 3 to 19, inclusive, of this act and any regulations adopted
by the Commissioner pursuant thereto do not apply to the coverage
of prescription drugs under a plan that is subject to the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 or any information relating
to such coverage.
2. A plan described in subsection 1 may, by contract, require a
pharmacy benefit manager that manages the coverage of
prescription drugs under the plan to comply with the requirements
of NRS 683A.171 to 683A.179, inclusive, and sections 3 to 19,
inclusive, of this act and any regulations adopted by the
Commissioner pursuant thereto.
3. The requirements of NRS 683A.171 to 683A.179, inclusive,
and sections 3 to 19, inclusive, of this act do not apply to the
coverage of prescription drugs provided by a managed care
organization for:
(a) Recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid
or the Children’s Health Insurance Program pursuant to a
contract with the Division of Health Care Financing and Policy of
-
*SB316_R1*

– 15 –
the Department of Health and Human Services entered into
pursuant to NRS 422.273; or
(b) Members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program.
Sec. 23. NRS 683A.178 is hereby amended to read as follows:
683A.178 1. A pharmacy benefit manager has [an] :
(a) A fiduciary duty to persons covered by a third party with
which the pharmacy benefit manager has entered into an
agreement to provide pharmacy benefit management services; and
(b) An obligation of good faith and fair dealing toward a third
party or pharmacy when performing duties pursuant to a contract to
which the pharmacy benefit manager is a party. [Any provision of a
contract that waives or limits that obligation is against public policy,
void and unenforceable.]
2. A pharmacy benefit manager [shall] :
(a) Shall notify a third party or pharmacy with which it has
entered into a contract in writing of any activity, policy or practice
of the pharmacy benefit manager that presents a conflict of interest
that interferes with the duties or obligations imposed by
subsection 1.
(b) Shall not engage in any activity or implement any policy or
practice that the pharmacy benefit manager reasonably anticipates
will present a conflict of interest that interferes with the ability of
the pharmacy benefit manager to discharge any duty or obligation
imposed by subsection 1.
3. A third party with which a pharmacy benefit manager has
entered into an agreement may audit all books and records of the
pharmacy benefit manager to the extent necessary to fulfill all
contractual obligations to covered persons and ensure compliance
with the provisions of the agreement, this chapter and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto. Such an audit may include,
without limitation, an examination of claims for pharmacy
benefits, rebates and any other information necessary to
accomplish the purposes set forth in this subsection.
4. A pharmacy benefit manager that manages prescription drug
benefits for an insurer licensed pursuant to this title shall comply
with the provisions of this title which are applicable to the insurer
when managing such benefits for the insurer.
5. Any provision of a contract that waives or limits any duty
or obligation imposed by this section is against public policy, void
and unenforceable.
Sec. 24. NRS 683A.179 is hereby amended to read as follows:
683A.179 1. A pharmacy benefit manager shall not:
(a) Prohibit a pharmacist or pharmacy from providing
information to a covered person concerning:
-
*SB316_R1*

– 16 –
(1) The amount of any copayment or coinsurance for a
prescription drug; or
(2) The availability of a less expensive alternative or generic
drug including, without limitation, information concerning clinical
efficacy of such a drug;
(b) Penalize a pharmacist or pharmacy for providing the
information described in paragraph (a) or selling a less expensive
alternative or generic drug to a covered person;
(c) Prohibit a pharmacy from offering or providing delivery
services directly to a covered person as an ancillary service of the
pharmacy; [or]
(d) If the pharmacy benefit manager manages a pharmacy
benefits plan that provides coverage through a network plan, charge
a copayment or coinsurance for a prescription drug in an amount
that is greater than the total amount paid to a pharmacy that is in the
network of providers under contract with the third party [.] ;
(e) Restrict, by contract or otherwise, the ability of a pharmacy
to share or disclose the details of a contract between the pharmacy
and the pharmacy benefit manager with the Commissioner;
(f) Reimburse a pharmacy for a prescription drug in an
amount that is less than the pharmacy pays a wholesaler for the
prescription drug, as reflected on the invoice provided by the
wholesaler to the pharmacy;
(g) Directly or indirectly reduce or allow the reduction of any
payment to a pharmacy under a pharmacy benefits plan managed
by the pharmacy benefit manager under a reconciliation process
to an effective rate of reimbursement;
(h) Directly or indirectly retroactively reduce or deny a claim
after the claim has been adjudicated unless:
(1) The original claim is fraudulent;
(2) The original payment of the claim was incorrect
because the pharmacy or pharmacist had already been paid for the
pharmacist services to which the claim relates; or
(3) The pharmacy or pharmacist that submitted the claim
did not properly render the pharmacist services to which the claim
relates;
(i) Reverse and resubmit the claim of a pharmacy:
(1) Without notifying and attempting to reconcile the claim
with the pharmacy; or
(2) More than 90 days after the claim was first affirmatively
adjudicated;
(j) Charge a pharmacy or a pharmacist a fee to process a claim
electronically;
-
*SB316_R1*

– 17 –
(k) Refuse to pay a claim after terminating a contract with a
pharmacy, except where the pharmacy benefit manager is
investigating possible insurance fraud; or
(l) Retaliate against a pharmacy for reporting a potential or
actual violation of this title or attempting to settle a dispute with a
pharmacy benefit manager based on a potential or actual violation
of this title.
2. The provisions of this section:
(a) Must not be construed to authorize a pharmacist to dispense
a drug that has not been prescribed by a practitioner, as defined in
NRS 639.0125, except to the extent authorized by a specific
provision of law, including, without limitation, NRS 453C.120,
639.28078 and 639.28085.
(b) Do not apply to an institutional pharmacy, as defined in NRS
639.0085, or a pharmacist working in such a pharmacy as an
employee or independent contractor.
3. Any provision of a contract that restricts the ability of a
pharmacy to share information pursuant to paragraph (e) of
subsection 1 is against public policy, void and unenforceable.
4. As used in this section, [“network plan” means a health
benefit plan offered by a health carrier under which the financing
and delivery of medical care is provided, in whole or in part,
through a defined set of providers under contract with the carrier.
The term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.] “retaliate” includes, without limitation:
(a) Terminating or refusing to renew a contract with a
pharmacy.
(b) Making the renewal of a contract with a pharmacy
contingent on the pharmacy acceding to terms and conditions not
applicable to other pharmacies.
(c) Subjecting the pharmacy to increased audits.
(d) Failing to promptly pay or reimburse a pharmacy without
substantial justification.
Sec. 25. Chapter 689A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health
insurance which provides coverage for prescription drugs:
(a) Shall not impose a cost-sharing obligation against an
insured for a prescription drug that exceeds the net amount that
the insurer pays for the drug, inclusive of any rebate received from
a pharmacy benefit manager in connection with providing
coverage for the drug.
(b) Shall include all amounts paid by an insured or another
person on behalf of an insured towards the cost of a covered
prescription drug when calculating the cost-sharing obligation of
-
*SB316_R1*

– 18 –
the insured for the drug or the maximum out-of-pocket expense
that the insured is required to pay for prescription drugs if:
(1) The drug does not have a generic equivalent; or
(2) The drug has a generic equivalent and the insured has:
(I) Obtained prior authorization, if required by the
insurer;
(II) Complied with any required step therapy protocol;
or
(III) Otherwise received approval from the insurer for
coverage of the prescription drug, including, without limitation,
through an exception, an appeals process established by the
insurer or other review process.
2. The provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 do not
apply with respect to the required deductible of a high deductible
health plan, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 223 (c)(2).
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Amounts paid” includes, without limitation, a discount,
incentive, coupon or other assistance provided to an insured by a
manufacturer or wholesaler of a prescription drug which is meant
to reduce the out-of-pocket cost that the insured is required to pay
for a prescription drug at the point of sale.
(b) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 6 of this act.
(c) “Generic equivalent” means a prescription drug that is
biologically equivalent and has the same active ingredient or
ingredients of the same strength, quantity and form of dosage as a
drug with a brand name.
Sec. 26. NRS 689A.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.330 If any policy is issued by a domestic insurer for
delivery to a person residing in another state, and if the insurance
commissioner or corresponding public officer of that other state has
informed the Commissioner that the policy is not subject to approval
or disapproval by that officer, the Commissioner may by ruling
require that the policy meet the standards set forth in NRS 689A.030
to 689A.320, inclusive [.] , and section 25 of this act.
Sec. 27. Chapter 689B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health
insurance which provides coverage for prescription drugs:
(a) Shall not impose a cost-sharing obligation against an
insured for a prescription drug that exceeds the net amount that
the insurer pays for the drug, inclusive of any rebate received from
a pharmacy benefit manager in connection with providing
coverage for the drug.
-
*SB316_R1*

– 19 –
(b) Shall include all amounts paid by an insured or another
person on behalf of an insured towards the cost of a covered
prescription drug when calculating the cost-sharing obligation of
the insured for the drug or the maximum out-of-pocket expense
that the insured is required to pay for prescription drugs if:
(1) The drug does not have a generic equivalent; or
(2) The drug has a generic equivalent and the insured has:
(I) Obtained prior authorization, if required by the
insurer;
(II) Complied with any required step therapy protocol;
or
(III) Otherwise received approval from the insurer for
coverage of the prescription drug, including, without limitation,
through an exception, an appeals process established by the
insurer or other review process.
2. The provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 do not
apply with respect to the required deductible of a high deductible
health plan, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2).
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Amounts paid” includes, without limitation, a discount,
incentive, coupon or other assistance provided to an insured by a
manufacturer or wholesaler of a prescription drug which is meant
to reduce the out-of-pocket cost that the insured is required to pay
for a prescription drug at the point of sale.
(b) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 6 of this act.
(c) “Generic equivalent” means a prescription drug that is
biologically equivalent and has the same active ingredient or
ingredients of the same strength, quantity and form of dosage as a
drug with a brand name.
Sec. 28. Chapter 689C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit plan which
provides coverage for prescription drugs:
(a) Shall not impose a cost-sharing obligation against an
insured for a prescription drug that exceeds the net amount that
the carrier pays for the drug, inclusive of any rebate received from
a pharmacy benefit manager in connection with providing
coverage for the drug.
(b) Shall include all amounts paid by an insured or another
person on behalf of an insured towards the cost of a covered
prescription drug when calculating the cost-sharing obligation of
the insured for the drug or the maximum out-of-pocket expense
that the insured is required to pay for prescription drugs if:
(1) The drug does not have a generic equivalent; or
-
*SB316_R1*

– 20 –
(2) The drug has a generic equivalent and the insured has:
(I) Obtained prior authorization, if required by the
carrier;
(II) Complied with any required step therapy protocol;
or
(III) Otherwise received approval from the carrier for
coverage of the prescription drug, including, without limitation,
through an exception, an appeals process established by the
carrier or other review process.
2. The provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 do not
apply with respect to the required deductible of a high deductible
health plan, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2).
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Amounts paid” includes, without limitation, a discount,
incentive, coupon or other assistance provided to an insured by a
manufacturer or wholesaler of a prescription drug which is meant
to reduce the out-of-pocket cost that the insured is required to pay
for a prescription drug at the point of sale.
(b) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 6 of this act.
(c) “Generic equivalent” means a prescription drug that is
biologically equivalent and has the same active ingredient or
ingredients of the same strength, quantity and form of dosage as a
drug with a brand name.
Sec. 29. NRS 689C.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689C.425 A voluntary purchasing group and any contract
issued to such a group pursuant to NRS 689C.360 to 689C.600,
inclusive, are subject to the provisions of NRS 689C.015 to
689C.355, inclusive, and section 28 of this act, to the extent
applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of NRS
687B.408 and 689C.360 to 689C.600, inclusive.
Sec. 30. Chapter 695A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract which
provides coverage for prescription drugs:
(a) Shall not impose a cost-sharing obligation against an
insured for a prescription drug that exceeds the net amount that
the society pays for the drug, inclusive of any rebate received from
a pharmacy benefit manager in connection with providing
coverage for the drug.
(b) Shall include all amounts paid by an insured or another
person on behalf of an insured towards the cost of a covered
prescription drug when calculating the cost-sharing obligation of
the insured for the drug or the maximum out-of-pocket expense
that the insured is required to pay for prescription drugs if:
-
*SB316_R1*

– 21 –
(1) The drug does not have a generic equivalent; or
(2) The drug has a generic equivalent and the insured has:
(I) Obtained prior authorization, if required by the
society;
(II) Complied with any required step therapy protocol;
or
(III) Otherwise received approval from the society for
coverage of the prescription drug, including, without limitation,
through an exception, an appeals process established by the
society or other review process.
2. The provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 do not
apply with respect to the required deductible of a high deductible
health plan, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2).
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Amounts paid” includes, without limitation, a discount,
incentive, coupon or other assistance provided to an insured by a
manufacturer or wholesaler of a prescription drug which is meant
to reduce the out-of-pocket cost that the insured is required to pay
for a prescription drug at the point of sale.
(b) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 6 of this act.
(c) “Generic equivalent” means a prescription drug that is
biologically equivalent and has the same active ingredient or
ingredients of the same strength, quantity and form of dosage as a
drug with a brand name.
Sec. 31. Chapter 695B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A hospital or medical services corporation that offers or
issues a policy of health insurance which provides coverage for
prescription drugs:
(a) Shall not impose a cost-sharing obligation against an
insured for a prescription drug that exceeds the net amount that
the hospital or medical services corporation pays for the drug,
inclusive of any rebate received from a pharmacy benefit manager
in connection with providing coverage for the drug.
(b) Shall include all amounts paid by an insured or another
person on behalf of an insured towards the cost of a covered
prescription drug when calculating the cost-sharing obligation of
the insured for the drug or the maximum out-of-pocket expense
that the insured is required to pay for prescription drugs if:
(1) The drug does not have a generic equivalent; or
(2) The drug has a generic equivalent and the insured has:
(I) Obtained prior authorization, if required by the
hospital or medical services corporation;
-
*SB316_R1*

– 22 –
(II) Complied with any required step therapy protocol;
or
(III) Otherwise received approval from the hospital or
medical services corporation for coverage of the prescription drug,
including, without limitation, through an exception, an appeals
process established by the hospital or medical services corporation
or other review process.
2. The provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 do not
apply with respect to the required deductible of a high deductible
health plan, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2).
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Amounts paid” includes, without limitation, a discount,
incentive, coupon or other assistance provided to an insured by a
manufacturer or wholesaler of a prescription drug which is meant
to reduce the out-of-pocket cost that the insured is required to pay
for a prescription drug at the point of sale.
(b) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 6 of this act.
(c) “Generic equivalent” means a prescription drug that is
biologically equivalent and has the same active ingredient or
ingredients of the same strength, quantity and form of dosage as a
drug with a brand name.
Sec. 32. Chapter 695C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A health maintenance organization that offers or issues a
health care plan which provides coverage for prescription drugs:
(a) Shall not impose a cost-sharing obligation against an
enrollee for a prescription drug that exceeds the net amount that
the health maintenance organization pays for the drug, inclusive
of any rebate received from a pharmacy benefit manager in
connection with providing coverage for the drug.
(b) Shall include all amounts paid by an enrollee or another
person on behalf of an enrollee towards the cost of a covered
prescription drug when calculating the cost-sharing obligation of
the enrollee for the drug or the maximum out-of-pocket expense
that the enrollee is required to pay for prescription drugs if:
(1) The drug does not have a generic equivalent; or
(2) The drug has a generic equivalent and the enrollee has:
(I) Obtained prior authorization, if required by the
health maintenance organization;
(II) Complied with any required step therapy protocol;
or
(III) Otherwise received approval from the health
maintenance organization for coverage of the prescription drug,
including, without limitation, through an exception, an appeals
-
*SB316_R1*

– 23 –
process established by the health maintenance organization or
other review process.
2. The provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 do not
apply with respect to the required deductible of a high deductible
health plan, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2).
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Amounts paid” includes, without limitation, a discount,
incentive, coupon or other assistance provided to an enrollee by a
manufacturer or wholesaler of a prescription drug which is meant
to reduce the out-of-pocket cost that the enrollee is required to pay
for a prescription drug at the point of sale.
(b) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 6 of this act.
(c) “Generic equivalent” means a prescription drug that is
biologically equivalent and has the same active ingredient or
ingredients of the same strength, quantity and form of dosage as a
drug with a brand name.
Sec. 33. NRS 695C.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.050 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or
in specific provisions of this title, the provisions of this title are not
applicable to any health maintenance organization granted a
certificate of authority under this chapter. This provision does not
apply to an insurer licensed and regulated pursuant to this title
except with respect to its activities as a health maintenance
organization authorized and regulated pursuant to this chapter.
2. Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance
organization granted a certificate of authority, or its representatives,
must not be construed to violate any provision of law relating to
solicitation or advertising by practitioners of a healing art.
3. Any health maintenance organization authorized under this
chapter shall not be deemed to be practicing medicine and is exempt
from the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS.
4. The provisions of NRS 695C.110, 695C.125, 695C.1691,
695C.1693, 695C.170, 695C.1703, 695C.1705, 695C.1709 to
695C.173, inclusive, 695C.1733, 695C.17335, 695C.1734,
695C.1751, 695C.1755, 695C.1759, 695C.176 to 695C.200,
inclusive, and 695C.265 and section 32 of this act do not apply to a
health maintenance organization that provides health care services
through managed care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan
for Medicaid or insurance pursuant to the Children’s Health
Insurance Program pursuant to a contract with the Division of
Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health and
Human Services. This subsection does not exempt a health
maintenance organization from any provision of this chapter for
services provided pursuant to any other contract.
-
*SB316_R1*

– 24 –
5. The provisions of NRS 695C.16932 to 695C.1699,
inclusive, 695C.1701, 695C.1708, 695C.1728, 695C.1731,
695C.17333, 695C.17345, 695C.17347, 695C.1736 to 695C.1745,
inclusive, 695C.1757 and 695C.204 apply to a health maintenance
organization that provides health care services through managed
care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid.
6. The provisions of NRS 695C.17095 and section 32 of this
act do not apply to a health maintenance organization that provides
health care services to members of the Public Employees’ Benefits
Program. This subsection does not exempt a health maintenance
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
7. The provisions of NRS 695C.1735 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to:
(a) The officers and employees, and the dependents of officers
and employees, of the governing body of any county, school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of this State; or
(b) Members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program.
 This subsection does not exempt a health maintenance
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
Sec. 34. NRS 695C.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.330 1. The Commissioner may suspend or revoke any
certificate of authority issued to a health maintenance organization
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if the Commissioner finds
that any of the following conditions exist:
(a) The health maintenance organization is operating
significantly in contravention of its basic organizational document,
its health care plan or in a manner contrary to that described in and
reasonably inferred from any other information submitted pursuant
to NRS 695C.060, 695C.070 and 695C.140, unless any amendments
to those submissions have been filed with and approved by the
Commissioner;
(b) The health maintenance organization issues evidence of
coverage or uses a schedule of charges for health care services
which do not comply with the requirements of NRS 695C.1691 to
695C.200, inclusive, and section 32 of this act or 695C.204 or
695C.207;
(c) The health care plan does not furnish comprehensive health
care services as provided for in NRS 695C.060;
(d) The Commissioner certifies that the health maintenance
organization:
(1) Does not meet the requirements of subsection 1 of NRS
695C.080; or
-
*SB316_R1*

– 25 –
(2) Is unable to fulfill its obligations to furnish health care
services as required under its health care plan;
(e) The health maintenance organization is no longer financially
responsible and may reasonably be expected to be unable to meet its
obligations to enrollees or prospective enrollees;
(f) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect a mechanism affording the enrollees an opportunity to
participate in matters relating to the content of programs pursuant to
NRS 695C.110;
(g) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect the system required by NRS 695C.260 for:
(1) Resolving complaints in a manner reasonably to dispose
of valid complaints; and
(2) Conducting external reviews of adverse determinations
that comply with the provisions of NRS 695G.241 to 695G.310,
inclusive;
(h) The health maintenance organization or any person on its
behalf has advertised or merchandised its services in an untrue,
misrepresentative, misleading, deceptive or unfair manner;
(i) The continued operation of the health maintenance
organization would be hazardous to its enrollees or creditors or to
the general public;
(j) The health maintenance organization fails to provide the
coverage required by NRS 695C.1691; or
(k) The health maintenance organization has otherwise failed to
comply substantially with the provisions of this chapter.
2. A certificate of authority must be suspended or revoked only
after compliance with the requirements of NRS 695C.340.
3. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is suspended, the health maintenance organization shall
not, during the period of that suspension, enroll any additional
groups or new individual contracts, unless those groups or persons
were contracted for before the date of suspension.
4. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is revoked, the organization shall proceed, immediately
following the effective date of the order of revocation, to wind up its
affairs and shall conduct no further business except as may be
essential to the orderly conclusion of the affairs of the organization.
It shall engage in no further advertising or solicitation of any kind.
The Commissioner may, by written order, permit such further
operation of the organization as the Commissioner may find to be in
the best interest of enrollees to the end that enrollees are afforded
the greatest practical opportunity to obtain continuing coverage for
health care.
-
*SB316_R1*

– 26 –
Sec. 35. Chapter 695F of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A prepaid limited health service organization that provides
coverage for prescription drugs:
(a) Shall not impose a cost-sharing obligation against an
enrollee for a prescription drug that exceeds the net amount that
the prepaid limited health service organization pays for the drug,
inclusive of any rebate received from a pharmacy benefit manager
in connection with providing coverage for the drug.
(b) Shall include all amounts paid by an enrollee or another
person on behalf of an enrollee towards the cost of a covered
prescription drug when calculating the cost-sharing obligation of
the enrollee for the drug or the maximum out-of-pocket expense
that the enrollee is required to pay for prescription drugs if:
(1) The drug does not have a generic equivalent; or
(2) The drug has a generic equivalent and the enrollee has:
(I) Obtained prior authorization, if required by the
prepaid limited health service organization;
(II) Complied with any required step therapy protocol;
or
(III) Otherwise received approval from the prepaid
limited health service organization for coverage of the prescription
drug, including, without limitation, through an exception, an
appeals process established by the prepaid limited health service
organization or other review process.
2. The provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 do not
apply with respect to the required deductible of a high deductible
health plan, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2).
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Amounts paid” includes, without limitation, a discount,
incentive, coupon or other assistance provided to an enrollee by a
manufacturer or wholesaler of a prescription drug which is meant
to reduce the out-of-pocket cost that the enrollee is required to pay
for a prescription drug at the point of sale.
(b) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 6 of this act.
(c) “Generic equivalent” means a prescription drug that is
biologically equivalent and has the same active ingredient or
ingredients of the same strength, quantity and form of dosage as a
drug with a brand name.
Sec. 36. Chapter 695G of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A managed care organization that offers or issues a health
care plan which provides coverage for prescription drugs:
-
*SB316_R1*

– 27 –
(a) Shall not impose a cost-sharing obligation against an
insured for a prescription drug that exceeds the net amount that
the managed care organization pays for the drug, inclusive of any
rebate received from a pharmacy benefit manager in connection
with providing coverage for the drug.
(b) Shall include all amounts paid by an insured or another
person on behalf of an insured towards the cost of a covered
prescription drug when calculating the cost-sharing obligation of
the insured for the drug or the maximum out-of-pocket expense
that the insured is required to pay for prescription drugs if:
(1) The drug does not have a generic equivalent; or
(2) The drug has a generic equivalent and the insured has:
(I) Obtained prior authorization, if required by the
managed care organization;
(II) Complied with any required step therapy protocol;
or
(III) Otherwise received approval from the managed
care organization for coverage of the prescription drug, including,
without limitation, through an exception, an appeals process
established by the managed care organization or other review
process.
2. The provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 do not
apply with respect to the required deductible of a high deductible
health plan, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2).
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Amounts paid” includes, without limitation, a discount,
incentive, coupon or other assistance provided to an insured by a
manufacturer or wholesaler of a prescription drug which is meant
to reduce the out-of-pocket cost that the insured is required to pay
for a prescription drug at the point of sale.
(b) “Cost-sharing obligation” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 6 of this act.
(c) “Generic equivalent” means a prescription drug that is
biologically equivalent and has the same active ingredient or
ingredients of the same strength, quantity and form of dosage as a
drug with a brand name.
Sec. 37. NRS 695G.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695G.090 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
the provisions of this chapter apply to each organization and insurer
that operates as a managed care organization and may include,
without limitation, an insurer that issues a policy of health
insurance, an insurer that issues a policy of individual or group
health insurance, a carrier serving small employers, a fraternal
benefit society, a hospital or medical service corporation and a
health maintenance organization.
-
*SB316_R1*

– 28 –
2. In addition to the provisions of this chapter, each managed
care organization shall comply with:
(a) The provisions of chapter 686A of NRS, including all
obligations and remedies set forth therein; and
(b) Any other applicable provision of this title.
3. The provisions of NRS 695G.127, 695G.1639, 695G.164,
695G.1645, 695G.167 and 695G.200 to 695G.230, inclusive, and
section 36 of this act do not apply to a managed care organization
that provides health care services to recipients of Medicaid under
the State Plan for Medicaid or insurance pursuant to the Children’s
Health Insurance Program pursuant to a contract with the Division
of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health
and Human Services.
4. The provisions of NRS 695C.1735 and 695G.1639 and
section 36 of this act do not apply to a managed care organization
that provides health care services to members of the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program.
5. Subsections 3 and 4 do not exempt a managed care
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
Sec. 38. NRS 41.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.600 1. [An] Except as otherwise provided in section 18 of
this act, an action may be brought by any person who is a victim of
consumer fraud.
2. As used in this section, “consumer fraud” means:
(a) An unlawful act as defined in NRS 119.330;
(b) An unlawful act as defined in NRS 205.2747;
(c) An act prohibited by NRS 482.36655 to 482.36667,
inclusive;
(d) An act prohibited by NRS 482.351;
(e) A deceptive trade practice as defined in NRS 598.0915 to
598.0925, inclusive; or
(f) A violation of NRS 417.133 or 417.135.
3. If the claimant is the prevailing party, the court shall award
the claimant:
(a) Any damages that the claimant has sustained;
(b) Any equitable relief that the court deems appropriate; and
(c) The claimant’s costs in the action and reasonable attorney’s
fees.
4. Any action brought pursuant to this section is not an action
upon any contract underlying the original transaction.
Sec. 39. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
-
*SB316_R1*

– 29 –
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
-
*SB316_R1*

– 30 –
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and sections 1 and 19 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of
chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391,
Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
-
*SB316_R1*

– 31 –
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
-
*SB316_R1*

– 32 –
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 40. NRS 287.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.010 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada may:
(a) Adopt and carry into effect a system of group life, accident
or health insurance, or any combination thereof, for the benefit of its
officers and employees, and the dependents of officers and
employees who elect to accept the insurance and who, where
necessary, have authorized the governing body to make deductions
from their compensation for the payment of premiums on the
insurance.
(b) Purchase group policies of life, accident or health insurance,
or any combination thereof, for the benefit of such officers and
employees, and the dependents of such officers and employees, as
have authorized the purchase, from insurance companies authorized
to transact the business of such insurance in the State of Nevada,
and, where necessary, deduct from the compensation of officers and
employees the premiums upon insurance and pay the deductions
upon the premiums.
(c) Provide group life, accident or health coverage through a
self-insurance reserve fund and, where necessary, deduct
contributions to the maintenance of the fund from the compensation
of officers and employees and pay the deductions into the fund. The
money accumulated for this purpose through deductions from the
compensation of officers and employees and contributions of the
governing body must be maintained as an internal service fund as
defined by NRS 354.543. The money must be deposited in a state or
national bank or credit union authorized to transact business in the
State of Nevada. Any independent administrator of a fund created
under this section is subject to the licensing requirements of chapter
683A of NRS, and must be a resident of this State. Any contract
with an independent administrator must be approved by the
Commissioner of Insurance as to the reasonableness of
administrative charges in relation to contributions collected and
benefits provided. The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597,
inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.408, 687B.692, 687B.723,
687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.030 to 689B.0317, inclusive, paragraphs
(b) and (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 689B.0319, subsections 2, 4, 6
and 7 of NRS 689B.0319, 689B.033 to 689B.0369, inclusive,
689B.0375 to 689B.050, inclusive, 689B.0675, 689B.265, 689B.287
and 689B.500 and section 27 of this act apply to coverage provided
pursuant to this paragraph, except that the provisions of
-
*SB316_R1*

– 33 –
NRS 689B.0378, 689B.03785 and 689B.500 only apply to coverage
for active officers and employees of the governing body, or the
dependents of such officers and employees.
(d) Defray part or all of the cost of maintenance of a self-
insurance fund or of the premiums upon insurance. The money for
contributions must be budgeted for in accordance with the laws
governing the county, school district, municipal corporation,
political subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental
agency of the State of Nevada.
2. If a school district offers group insurance to its officers and
employees pursuant to this section, members of the board of trustees
of the school district must not be excluded from participating in the
group insurance. If the amount of the deductions from compensation
required to pay for the group insurance exceeds the compensation to
which a trustee is entitled, the difference must be paid by the trustee.
3. In any county in which a legal services organization exists,
the governing body of the county, or of any school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada in the
county, may enter into a contract with the legal services
organization pursuant to which the officers and employees of the
legal services organization, and the dependents of those officers and
employees, are eligible for any life, accident or health insurance
provided pursuant to this section to the officers and employees, and
the dependents of the officers and employees, of the county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency.
4. If a contract is entered into pursuant to subsection 3, the
officers and employees of the legal services organization:
(a) Shall be deemed, solely for the purposes of this section, to be
officers and employees of the county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other local
governmental agency with which the legal services organization has
contracted; and
(b) Must be required by the contract to pay the premiums or
contributions for all insurance which they elect to accept or of which
they authorize the purchase.
5. A contract that is entered into pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Must be submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance for
approval not less than 30 days before the date on which the contract
is to become effective.
(b) Does not become effective unless approved by the
Commissioner.
(c) Shall be deemed to be approved if not disapproved by the
Commissioner within 30 days after its submission.
-
*SB316_R1*

– 34 –
6. As used in this section, “legal services organization” means
an organization that operates a program for legal aid and receives
money pursuant to NRS 19.031.
Sec. 41. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of
NRS 439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352,
687B.409, 687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.0353,
689B.255, 695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155, 695G.160, 695G.162,
695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645, 695G.1665, 695G.167,
695G.1675, 695G.170 to 695G.1712, inclusive, 695G.1714 to
695G.174, inclusive, 695G.176, 695G.177, 695G.200 to 695G.230,
inclusive, other than section 36 of this act, 695G.241 to 695G.310,
inclusive, 695G.405 and 695G.415, in the same manner as an
insurer that is licensed pursuant to title 57 of NRS is required to
comply with those provisions.
Sec. 42. NRS 598.0977 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.0977 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 603A.550 [,]
and section 18 of this act, if an elderly person or a person with a
disability suffers damage or injury as a result of a deceptive trade
practice, he or she or his or her legal representative, if any, may
commence a civil action against any person who engaged in the
practice to recover the actual damages suffered by the elderly person
or person with a disability, punitive damages, if appropriate, and
reasonable attorney’s fees. The collection of any restitution awarded
pursuant to this section has a priority over the collection of any civil
penalty imposed pursuant to NRS 598.0973.
Sec. 43. The amendatory provisions of this act do not apply to
any contract or other agreement entered into before January 1, 2026,
but apply to the renewal of any such contract or other agreement.
Sec. 44. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 45. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 46. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 16, inclusive, and 17 to 45, inclusive, of this
act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
-
*SB316_R1*

– 35 –
3. Section 16.5 of this act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2028, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB316_R1*